Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.620

Motor vehicle transportation service—Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and enforce rules as may be deemed necessary to accomplish the purpose of RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.630, * 43.41.130, and * 43.41.140. The rules, in addition to other matters, shall provide authority for any agency director or his or her delegate to approve the use on official state business of personally owned or commercially owned rental passenger motor vehicles. Before such an authorization is made, it must first be reasonably determined that state owned passenger vehicles or other suitable transportation is not available at the time or location required or that the use of such other transportation would not be conducive to the economical, efficient, and effective conduct of business.

The rules shall be consistent with and shall carry out the objectives of the general policies and guidelines adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to *RCW 43.41.130.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 235; 2009 c 549 s 5069; 1989 c 57 s 7; 1979 c 151 s 103; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41.130 and 43.41.140 were recodified as RCW 43.19.622 and 43.19.623, respectively, pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 325.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1989 c 57: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1989." [ 1989 c 57 s 11.]

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.